Indiana, session 2026, HB1214.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 33-39-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.55-2022,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section, "federal
enforcement officer" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-129.
(b) As used in this section, "law enforcement officer" has the
meaning set forth in IC 5-2-1-2.
(a) (c) The prosecuting attorney of any judicial circuit of Indiana
may appoint an employee, including an investigator, with the approval
of the county council or councils. An employee appointed under this
section works under the direction of the prosecuting attorney.
(b) (d) An investigator appointed under this section who is not
covered by a crime insurance policy described in IC 5-4-1-20 shall give
bond in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(c) (e) An investigator appointed under this section has the same
police powers:
(1) within the county authorized by law to all police officers; or
(2) within the state authorized by law to all police officers if
2026 IN 1214—LS 6638/DI 151


the investigator was previously employed for at least five (5)
years as:
(A) a law enforcement officer; or
(B) a federal enforcement officer.
(d) (f) In each judicial circuit the salary or other compensation to be
paid an investigator appointed under this section shall be set by the
county council or councils. A county council or councils may not
reduce the number of investigators or compensation of any investigator
without approval of the prosecuting attorney.
2026 IN 1214—LS 6638/DI 151